Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2009
Removal of flag.

Upon notification of recovery of such missing person, the department, the county agency, and any school pursuant to section 43-2007 shall remove the flag from such person's record.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 87.